Nebraska, session 109, LB1052.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1052 LB1052
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-257, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-257 The school board or board of education may authorize the
emergency exclusion, short-term or long-term suspension, expulsion, or
mandatory reassignment of any student pupil from school for conduct
prohibited by the board's rules or standards established pursuant to the
Student Discipline Act if such emergency exclusion, short-term or long-
term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment complies with the
procedures required by the act.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-257, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-